Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-121
Governor; succession to office; resignation required.

If, for any of the reasons mentioned in Article IV, section 16, of the Constitution of Nebraska, the Lieutenant Governor is unable to perform the duties that devolve on him or her as Governor, then the Speaker of the Legislature shall, upon his or her resignation as speaker and as a member of the Legislature, become Governor.

If for any of the reasons mentioned in Article IV, section 16, of the Constitution of Nebraska, there is a vacancy in the office of Governor after the succession of the speaker to such office, then the chairperson of the several committees in the order listed in section 84-120 shall, after resignation as such chairperson and member of the Legislature, become Governor.

Laws 1959, c. 449, § 2, p. 1500;

Laws 1992, LB 965, § 6.